Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1745
Retention of membership; when.

Members who cease to be eligible or who leave the field of membership may be permitted to retain their membership in the credit union under reasonable standards established by the board of directors unless terminated by withdrawal or expulsion.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 45.